Illinois, session 104th, SB3239.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act is 5amended by changing Sections 2, 3, 4, 4.2, 5, 6, 6.2, 8.5, 8.7, 610, 11, 12, 12.2, and 13 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 3960/2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1152)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)9    Sec. 2. Purpose of the Act. This Act shall establish a 10procedure (1) which requires a person establishing, 11constructing or modifying a health care facility, as herein 12defined, to have the qualifications, background, character and 13financial resources to adequately provide a proper service for 14the community; (2) that promotes the orderly and economic 15development of health care facilities in the State of Illinois 16that avoids unnecessary duplication of such facilities; and 17(3) that promotes planning for and development of health care 18facilities needed for comprehensive health care especially in 19areas where the health planning process has identified unmet 20needs.21    The changes made to this Act by this amendatory Act of the 2296th General Assembly are intended to accomplish the following 23objectives: to improve the financial ability of the public to   SB3239- 2 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1obtain necessary health services; to establish an orderly and 2comprehensive health care delivery system that will guarantee 3the availability of quality health care to the general public; 4to maintain and improve the provision of essential health care 5services and increase the accessibility of those services to 6the medically underserved and indigent; to assure that the 7reduction and closure of health care services or facilities is 8performed in an orderly and timely manner, and that these 9actions are deemed to be in the best interests of the public; 10and to assess the financial burden to patients caused by 11unnecessary health care construction and modification. 12Evidence-based assessments, projections and decisions will be 13applied regarding capacity, quality, value and equity in the 14delivery of health care services in Illinois. The integrity of 15the Certificate of Need Permit and Certificate of Exemption 16processes are process is ensured through ethical practices and 17effective communication revised ethics and communications 18procedures. Cost containment and support for safety net 19services must continue to be central tenets of the Certificate 20of Need Permit and Certificate of Exemption processes process. 21(Source: P.A. 99-527, eff. 1-1-17.) 22    (20 ILCS 3960/3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1153)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)24    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act:25    "Certificate of Need" or "permit" means the authorization   SB3239- 3 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1for a health care facility to conduct activities or 2transactions that require Board approval under this Act, 3including constructing or modifying the health care facility 4and acquiring major medical equipment.5    "Certificate of Exemption" or "exemption" means the 6authorization for a health care facility to conduct activities 7or transactions that are exempt from the permitting 8requirements under this Act, including changes of ownership, 9discontinuation of a single category of service, and the 10establishment or expansion of a neonatal intensive care 11service or the addition of beds. 12    "Health care facilities" means and includes the following 13facilities, organizations, and related persons:14        (1) An ambulatory surgical treatment center required 15    to be licensed pursuant to the Ambulatory Surgical 16    Treatment Center Act.17        (2) An institution, place, building, or agency 18    required to be licensed pursuant to the Hospital Licensing 19    Act.20        (3) Skilled and intermediate long term care facilities 21    licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act.22            (A) If a demonstration project under the Nursing 23        Home Care Act applies for a certificate of need to 24        convert to a nursing facility, it shall meet the 25        licensure and certificate of need requirements in 26        effect as of the date of application.  SB3239- 4 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1            (B) Except as provided in item (A) of this 2        subsection, this Act does not apply to facilities 3        granted waivers under Section 3-102.2 of the Nursing 4        Home Care Act.5        (3.5) Skilled and intermediate care facilities 6    licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or the MC/DD 7    Act. No permit or exemption is required for a facility 8    licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or the MC/DD 9    Act prior to the reduction of the number of beds at a 10    facility. If there is a total reduction of beds at a 11    facility licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or 12    the MC/DD Act, this is a discontinuation or closure of the 13    facility. If a facility licensed under the ID/DD Community 14    Care Act or the MC/DD Act reduces the number of beds or 15    discontinues the facility, that facility must notify the 16    Board as provided in Section 14.1 of this Act. 17        (3.7) Facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental 18    Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013. 19        (4) Hospitals, nursing homes, ambulatory surgical 20    treatment centers, or kidney disease treatment centers 21    maintained by the State or any department or agency 22    thereof.23        (5) Kidney disease treatment centers, including a 24    free-standing hemodialysis unit required to meet the 25    requirements of 42 CFR 494 in order to be certified for 26    participation in Medicare and Medicaid under Titles XVIII   SB3239- 5 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    and XIX of the federal Social Security Act.2            (A) This Act does not apply to a dialysis facility 3        that provides only dialysis training, support, and 4        related services to individuals with end stage renal 5        disease who have elected to receive home dialysis.6            (B) This Act does not apply to a dialysis unit 7        located in a licensed nursing home that offers or 8        provides dialysis-related services to residents with 9        end stage renal disease who have elected to receive 10        home dialysis within the nursing home.11            (C) The Board, however, may require dialysis 12        facilities and licensed nursing homes under items (A) 13        and (B) of this subsection to report statistical 14        information on a quarterly basis to the Board to be 15        used by the Board to conduct analyses on the need for 16        proposed kidney disease treatment centers. 17        (6) An institution, place, building, or room used for 18    the performance of outpatient surgical procedures that is 19    leased, owned, or operated by or on behalf of an 20    out-of-state facility.21        (7) An institution, place, building, or room used for 22    provision of a health care category of service, including, 23    but not limited to, cardiac catheterization and open heart 24    surgery.25        (8) An institution, place, building, or room housing 26    major medical equipment used in the direct clinical   SB3239- 6 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    diagnosis or treatment of patients, and whose project cost 2    is in excess of the capital expenditure minimum. 3    "Health care facilities" does not include the following 4entities or facility transactions:5        (1) Federally-owned facilities.6        (2) Facilities used solely for healing by prayer or 7    spiritual means.8        (3) An existing facility located on any campus 9    facility as defined in Section 5-5.8b of the Illinois 10    Public Aid Code, provided that the campus facility 11    encompasses 30 or more contiguous acres and that the new 12    or renovated facility is intended for use by a licensed 13    residential facility.14        (4) Facilities licensed under the Supportive 15    Residences Licensing Act or the Assisted Living and Shared 16    Housing Act.17        (5) Facilities designated as supportive living 18    facilities that are in good standing with the program 19    established under Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public 20    Aid Code.21        (6) Facilities established and operating under the 22    Alternative Health Care Delivery Act as a children's 23    community-based health care center alternative health care 24    model demonstration program or as an Alzheimer's Disease 25    Management Center alternative health care model 26    demonstration program.  SB3239- 7 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1        (7) The closure of an entity or a portion of an entity 2    licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 3    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD 4    Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, with the exception 5    of facilities operated by a county or Illinois Veterans 6    Homes, that elect to convert, in whole or in part, to an 7    assisted living or shared housing establishment licensed 8    under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act and with 9    the exception of a facility licensed under the Specialized 10    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013 in connection 11    with a proposal to close a facility and re-establish the 12    facility in another location.13        (8) Any change of ownership of a health care facility 14    that is licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the 15    Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the 16    ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, with the 17    exception of facilities operated by a county or Illinois 18    Veterans Homes. Changes of ownership of facilities 19    licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act must meet the 20    requirements set forth in Sections 3-101 through 3-119 of 21    the Nursing Home Care Act.22        (9) (Blank). 23    With the exception of those health care facilities 24specifically included in this Section, nothing in this Act 25shall be intended to include facilities operated as a part of 26the practice of a physician or other licensed health care   SB3239- 8 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1professional, whether practicing in his individual capacity or 2within the legal structure of any partnership, medical or 3professional corporation, or unincorporated medical or 4professional group. Further, this Act shall not apply to 5physicians or other licensed health care professional's 6practices where such practices are carried out in a portion of 7a health care facility under contract with such health care 8facility by a physician or by other licensed health care 9professionals, whether practicing in his individual capacity 10or within the legal structure of any partnership, medical or 11professional corporation, or unincorporated medical or 12professional groups, unless the entity constructs, modifies, 13or establishes a health care facility as specifically defined 14in this Section. This Act shall apply to construction or 15modification and to establishment by such health care facility 16of such contracted portion which is subject to facility 17licensing requirements, irrespective of the party responsible 18for such action or attendant financial obligation. 19    "Person" means any one or more natural persons, legal 20entities, governmental bodies other than federal, or any 21combination thereof.22    "Consumer" means any person other than a person (a) whose 23major occupation currently involves or whose official capacity 24within the last 12 months has involved the providing, 25administering or financing of any type of health care 26facility, (b) who is engaged in health research or the   SB3239- 9 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1teaching of health, (c) who has a material financial interest 2in any activity which involves the providing, administering or 3financing of any type of health care facility, or (d) who is or 4ever has been a member of the immediate family of the person 5defined by item (a), (b), or (c).6    "State Board" or "Board" means the Health Facilities and 7Services Review Board.8    "Construction or modification" means the establishment, 9erection, building, alteration, reconstruction, 10modernization, improvement, extension, discontinuation, 11change of ownership, of or by a health care facility, or the 12purchase or acquisition by or through a health care facility 13of equipment or service for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes 14or for facility administration or operation, or any capital 15expenditure made by or on behalf of a health care facility 16which exceeds the capital expenditure minimum; however, any 17capital expenditure made by or on behalf of a health care 18facility for (i) the construction or modification of a 19facility licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing 20Act or (ii) a conversion project undertaken in accordance with 21Section 30 of the Older Adult Services Act shall be excluded 22from any obligations under this Act.23    "Discontinuation" means to, on a voluntary or involuntary 24basis, cease the operation of a health care facility or 25discontinue a category of service. 26    "Establish" means the construction of a health care   SB3239- 10 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1facility or the replacement of an existing health care 2facility on another site or the initiation of a category of 3service.4    "Major medical equipment" means medical equipment which is 5used for the provision of medical and other health services 6and which costs in excess of the capital expenditure minimum, 7except that such term does not include medical equipment 8acquired by or on behalf of a clinical laboratory to provide 9clinical laboratory services if the clinical laboratory is 10independent of a physician's office and a hospital and it has 11been determined under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act 12to meet the requirements of paragraphs (10) and (11) of 13Section 1861(s) of such Act. In determining whether medical 14equipment has a value in excess of the capital expenditure 15minimum, the value of studies, surveys, designs, plans, 16working drawings, specifications, and other activities 17essential to the acquisition of such equipment shall be 18included.19    "Capital expenditure" means an expenditure: (A) made by or 20on behalf of a health care facility (as such a facility is 21defined in this Act); and (B) which under generally accepted 22accounting principles is not properly chargeable as an expense 23of operation and maintenance, or is made to obtain by lease or 24comparable arrangement any facility or part thereof or any 25equipment for a facility or part; and which exceeds the 26capital expenditure minimum.  SB3239- 11 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    For the purpose of this paragraph, the cost of any 2studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, 3specifications, and other activities essential to the 4acquisition, improvement, expansion, or replacement of any 5plant or equipment with respect to which an expenditure is 6made shall be included in determining if such expenditure 7exceeds the capital expenditures minimum. Unless otherwise 8interdependent, or submitted as one project by the applicant, 9components of construction or modification undertaken by means 10of a single construction contract or financed through the 11issuance of a single debt instrument shall not be grouped 12together as one project. Donations of equipment or facilities 13to a health care facility which if acquired directly by such 14facility would be subject to review under this Act shall be 15considered capital expenditures, and a transfer of equipment 16or facilities for less than fair market value shall be 17considered a capital expenditure for purposes of this Act if a 18transfer of the equipment or facilities at fair market value 19would be subject to review.20    "Capital expenditure minimum" means $11,500,000 for 21projects by hospital applicants, $6,500,000 for applicants for 22projects related to skilled and intermediate care long-term 23care facilities licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, and 24$3,000,000 for projects by all other applicants, which shall 25be annually adjusted to reflect the increase in construction 26costs due to inflation, for major medical equipment and for   SB3239- 12 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1all other capital expenditures.2    "Financial commitment" means the commitment of at least 333% of total funds assigned to cover total project cost, which 4occurs by the actual expenditure of 33% or more of the total 5project cost or the commitment to expend 33% or more of the 6total project cost by signed contracts or other legal means. 7    "Non-clinical service area" means an area (i) for the 8benefit of the patients, visitors, staff, or employees of a 9health care facility and (ii) not directly related to the 10diagnosis, treatment, or rehabilitation of persons receiving 11services from the health care facility. "Non-clinical service 12areas" include, but are not limited to, chapels; gift shops; 13news stands; computer systems; tunnels, walkways, and 14elevators; telephone systems; projects to comply with life 15safety codes; educational facilities; components in a patient 16care unit used as educational space, consultation and 17touchdown rooms, and on-call rooms; student housing; patient, 18employee, staff, and visitor dining areas; administration and 19volunteer offices; modernization of structural components 20(such as roof replacement and masonry work); boiler repair or 21replacement; vehicle maintenance and storage facilities; 22parking facilities; mechanical systems for heating, 23ventilation, and air conditioning; loading docks; and repair 24or replacement of carpeting, tile, wall coverings, window 25coverings or treatments, or furniture. "Non-clinical service 26area" does not include health and fitness centers, areas in a   SB3239- 13 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1patient care unit, or areas that are required by Department 2licensing standards, including life safety code regulations, 3such as hallways and other interdependent components to a 4clinical area.5    "Areawide" means a major area of the State delineated on a 6geographic, demographic, and functional basis for health 7planning and for health service and having within it one or 8more local areas for health planning and health service. The 9term "region", as contrasted with the term "subregion", and 10the word "area" may be used synonymously with the term 11"areawide".12    "Local" means a subarea of a delineated major area that on 13a geographic, demographic, and functional basis may be 14considered to be part of such major area. The term "subregion" 15may be used synonymously with the term "local".16    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice in 17accordance with the Medical Practice Act of 1987, as amended.18    "Licensed health care professional" means a person 19licensed to practice a health profession under pertinent 20licensing statutes of the State of Illinois.21    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Department 22of Public Health.23    "Agency" or "Department" means the Illinois Department of 24Public Health.25    "Alternative health care model" means a facility or 26program authorized under the Alternative Health Care Delivery   SB3239- 14 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1Act.2    "Out-of-state facility" means a person that is both (i) 3licensed as a hospital or as an ambulatory surgery center 4under the laws of another state or that qualifies as a hospital 5or an ambulatory surgery center under regulations adopted 6pursuant to the Social Security Act and (ii) not licensed 7under the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act, the 8Hospital Licensing Act, or the Nursing Home Care Act. 9Affiliates of out-of-state facilities shall be considered 10out-of-state facilities. Affiliates of Illinois licensed 11health care facilities 100% owned by an Illinois licensed 12health care facility, its parent, or Illinois physicians 13licensed to practice medicine in all its branches shall not be 14considered out-of-state facilities. Nothing in this definition 15shall be construed to include an office or any part of an 16office of a physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 17branches in Illinois that is not required to be licensed under 18the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act.19    "Change of ownership of a health care facility" means a 20change in the person who has ownership or control of a health 21care facility's physical plant and capital assets. A change in 22ownership is indicated by the following transactions: sale, 23transfer, acquisition, lease, change of sponsorship, or other 24means of transferring control.25    "Related person" means any person that: (i) is at least 2650% owned, directly or indirectly, by either the health care   SB3239- 15 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1facility or a person owning, directly or indirectly, at least 250% of the health care facility; or (ii) owns, directly or 3indirectly, at least 50% of the health care facility.4    "Charity care" means care provided by a health care 5facility for which the provider does not expect to receive 6payment from the patient or a third-party payer.7    "Freestanding emergency center" means a facility subject 8to licensure under Section 32.5 of the Emergency Medical 9Services (EMS) Systems Act.10    "Category of service" means a grouping by generic class of 11various types or levels of support functions, equipment, care, 12or treatment provided to patients or residents, including, but 13not limited to, classes such as medical-surgical, pediatrics, 14or cardiac catheterization. A category of service may include 15subcategories or levels of care that identify a particular 16degree or type of care within the category of service. Nothing 17in this definition shall be construed to include the practice 18of a physician or other licensed health care professional 19while functioning in an office providing for the care, 20diagnosis, or treatment of patients. A category of service 21that is subject to the Board's jurisdiction must be designated 22in rules adopted by the Board.23    "State Board Staff Report" means the document that sets 24forth the review and findings of the State Board staff, as 25prescribed by the State Board, regarding applications subject 26to Board jurisdiction.   SB3239- 16 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    "Patient care unit" means a physically identifiable and 2organized unit in a clearly defined administrative and 3geographic area that meets applicable standards of service in 4which nursing care and therapeutic services are provided on a 5continuous basis and to which specific nursing and support 6staff are assigned. "Patient care unit" does not include 7education spaces, consultation and touchdown rooms, and 8on-call rooms that are not required by Department licensing 9standards.10    "Provider" includes, but is not limited to, a hospital, 11long-term care facility, end-stage renal dialysis facility, 12ambulatory surgical treatment center, freestanding emergency 13center, or birth center. 14(Source: P.A. 104-365, eff. 1-1-26.) 15    (20 ILCS 3960/4)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1154)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)17    Sec. 4. Health Facilities and Services Review Board; 18membership; appointment; term; compensation; quorum. 19    (a) There is created the Health Facilities and Services 20Review Board, which shall perform the functions described in 21this Act. The Department shall provide operational support to 22the Board as necessary, including the provision of office 23space, supplies, and clerical, financial, and accounting 24services. The Board may contract for functions or operational 25support as needed. The Board may also contract with experts   SB3239- 17 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1related to specific health services or facilities and create 2technical advisory panels to assist in the development of 3criteria, standards, and procedures used in the evaluation of 4applications for permit and exemption. 5    (b) The State Board shall consist of 11 voting members. 6All members shall be residents of Illinois and at least 4 shall 7reside outside the Chicago Metropolitan Statistical Area 8Census Data. Consideration shall be given to potential 9appointees who reflect the ethnic and cultural diversity of 10the State. Neither Board members nor Board staff shall be 11convicted felons or have pled guilty to a felony.12    Each member shall have a reasonable knowledge of the 13practice, procedures and principles of the health care 14delivery system in Illinois, including at least 5 members who 15shall be knowledgeable about health care delivery systems, 16health systems planning, finance, or the management of health 17care facilities currently regulated under the Act. One member 18shall be a representative of a non-profit health care consumer 19advocacy organization. One member shall be a representative 20from the community with experience on the effects of 21discontinuing health care services or the closure of health 22care facilities on the surrounding community; provided, 23however, that all other members of the Board shall be 24appointed before this member shall be appointed. A spouse, 25parent, sibling, or child of a Board member cannot be an 26employee, agent, or under contract with services or facilities   SB3239- 18 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1subject to the Act. Prior to appointment and in the course of 2service on the Board, members of the Board shall disclose the 3employment or other financial interest of any other relative 4of the member, if known, in service or facilities subject to 5the Act. Members of the Board shall declare any conflict of 6interest that may exist with respect to the status of those 7relatives and recuse themselves from voting on any issue for 8which a conflict of interest is declared. No person shall be 9appointed or continue to serve as a member of the State Board 10who is, or whose spouse, parent, sibling, or child is, a member 11of the Board of Directors of, has a financial interest in, or 12has a business relationship with a health care facility.13    Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 14contrary, the term of office of each member of the State Board 15serving on the day before the effective date of this 16amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly is abolished on 17the date upon which members of the Board, as established by 18this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, have been 19appointed and can begin to take action as a Board. 20    (c) The State Board shall be appointed by the Governor, 21with the advice and consent of the Senate. Not more than 6 of 22the appointments shall be of the same political party at the 23time of the appointment. 24    The Secretary of Human Services, the Director of 25Healthcare and Family Services, and the Director of Public 26Health, or their designated representatives, shall serve as   SB3239- 19 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1ex-officio, non-voting members of the State Board.2    (d) Of those members initially appointed by the Governor 3following the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 496th General Assembly, 3 shall serve for terms expiring July 51, 2011, 3 shall serve for terms expiring July 1, 2012, and 3 6shall serve for terms expiring July 1, 2013. Thereafter, each 7appointed member shall hold office for a term of 3 years, 8provided that any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring 9prior to the expiration of the term for which his or her 10predecessor was appointed shall be appointed for the remainder 11of such term and the term of office of each successor shall 12commence on July 1 of the year in which his predecessor's term 13expires. Each member shall hold office until his or her 14successor is appointed and qualified. The Governor may 15reappoint a member for additional terms, but no member shall 16serve more than 3 terms, subject to review and re-approval 17every 3 years. 18    (e) State Board members, while serving on business of the 19State Board, shall receive actual and necessary travel and 20subsistence expenses while so serving away from their places 21of residence. Until March 1, 2010, a member of the State Board 22who experiences a significant financial hardship due to the 23loss of income on days of attendance at meetings or while 24otherwise engaged in the business of the State Board may be 25paid a hardship allowance, as determined by and subject to the 26approval of the Governor's Travel Control Board.   SB3239- 20 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    (f) The Governor shall designate one of the members to 2serve as the Chairman of the Board, who shall be a person with 3expertise in health care delivery system planning, finance or 4management of health care facilities that are regulated under 5the Act. The Chairman shall annually review Board member 6performance and shall report the attendance record of each 7Board member to the General Assembly. 8    (g) The State Board, through the Chairman, shall prepare a 9separate and distinct budget approved by the General Assembly 10and shall hire and supervise its own professional staff 11responsible for carrying out the responsibilities of the 12Board.13    (h) The State Board shall meet at least every 45 days, or 14as often as the Chairman of the State Board deems necessary, or 15upon the request of a majority of the members.16    (i) Six members of the State Board shall constitute a 17quorum. The affirmative vote of 6 of the members of the State 18Board shall be necessary for any action requiring a vote to be 19taken by the State Board. A vacancy in the membership of the 20State Board shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise 21all the rights and perform all the duties of the State Board as 22provided by this Act.23    (j) A State Board member shall disqualify himself or 24herself from the consideration of any application for a permit 25or exemption in which the State Board member or the State Board 26member's spouse, parent, sibling, or child: (i) has an   SB3239- 21 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1economic interest in the matter; or (ii) is employed by, 2serves as a consultant for, or is a member of the governing 3board of the applicant or a party opposing the application.4    (k) The Chairman, Board members, and Board staff must 5comply with the Illinois Governmental Ethics Act. 6(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21.) 7    (20 ILCS 3960/4.2)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)9    Sec. 4.2. Ex parte communications. 10    (a) Except in the disposition of matters that agencies are 11authorized by law to entertain or dispose of on an ex parte 12basis including, but not limited to rulemaking, the State 13Board, any State Board member, employee, or a hearing officer 14shall not engage in ex parte communication in connection with 15the substance of any formally filed application for a permit 16with any person or party or the representative of any party. 17This subsection (a) applies when the Board, member, employee, 18or administrative law judge hearing officer knows, or should 19know upon reasonable inquiry, that the application or 20exemption has been formally filed with the State Board. 21Nothing in this Section shall prohibit State Board employees 22staff members from providing technical assistance to 23applicants. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit State Board 24employees staff from verifying or clarifying an applicant's 25information as it prepares the State Board Staff Report. Once   SB3239- 22 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1an application for permit or exemption is filed and deemed 2complete, a written record of any communication between State 3Board employees staff and an applicant shall be prepared by 4staff and made part of the public record, using a prescribed, 5standardized format, and shall be included in the application 6file. 7    (b) A State Board member or employee may communicate with 8other members or employees and any State Board member or 9hearing officer may have the aid and advice of one or more 10personal assistants.11    (c) An ex parte communication received by the State Board, 12any State Board member, employee, or an administrative law 13judge a hearing officer shall be made a part of the record of 14the matter, including all written communications, all written 15responses to the communications, and a memorandum stating the 16substance of all oral communications and all responses made 17and the identity of each person from whom the ex parte 18communication was received.19    (d) "Ex parte communication" means any written or oral a 20communication between a person who is not a State Board member 21or employee and a State Board member or employee that imparts 22or requests material information or makes a material argument 23regarding potential action reflects on the substance of a 24pending or impending permit or exemption application or State 25Board proceeding and that takes place outside the open record 26of the proceeding. "Ex parte communication" does not include:   SB3239- 23 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1(i) statements by a person publicly made in a public forum; 2(ii) statements regarding matters of procedure and practice, 3such as the format of application materials, the number of 4copies required, the manner of filing, and the status of a 5matter; and (iii) statements made between a State Board member 6or employee and another State Board member or employee. 7Communications regarding matters of procedure and practice, 8such as the format of pleading, number of copies required, 9manner of service, and status of proceedings, are not 10considered ex parte communications. Technical assistance with 11respect to an application, not intended to influence any 12decision on the application, may be provided by employees to 13the applicant. Any technical assistance shall be documented in 14writing by the applicant and employees within 10 business days 15after the technical assistance is provided and made part of 16the open record.17    (e) For purposes of this Section, "employee" means a 18person the State Board or the Agency employs on a full-time, 19part-time, contract, or intern basis.20    (f) The State Board, State Board member, or administrative 21law judge hearing examiner presiding over the proceeding, in 22the event of a violation of this Section, must take whatever 23action is necessary to ensure that the violation does not 24prejudice any party or adversely affect the fairness of the 25proceedings.26    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent   SB3239- 24 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1the State Board or any member of the State Board from 2consulting with the attorney for the State Board.3(Source: P.A. 100-518, eff. 6-1-18; 100-681, eff. 8-3-18; 4101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 5    (20 ILCS 3960/5)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1155)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)7    Sec. 5. Construction, modification, or establishment of 8health care facilities or acquisition of major medical 9equipment; permits or exemptions. 10    (a) The State Board shall consider and decide applications 11for permits and exemptions in a manner that protects access to 12essential health care services, promotes orderly health 13planning, and safeguards the public health and continuity of 14care. 15    (b) No person shall construct, modify or establish a 16health care facility or acquire major medical equipment 17without first obtaining a permit or exemption from the State 18Board. 19    (c) The Board may review the applicable criteria in the 20consideration of any application for an exemption submitted 21under this Act. The submission of an application and 22information required by the State Board, as established by 23rule, shall not obligate the State Board to grant an 24exemption. Upon review and consideration, the State Board may 25approve, deny, or defer for additional information an   SB3239- 25 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1application for an exemption, as deemed appropriate. If an 2exemption is denied, the applicant shall file an application 3for a permit. 4    (d) The State Board shall not delegate to the staff of the 5State Board or any other person or entity the authority to 6grant permits or exemptions whenever the staff or other person 7or entity would be required to exercise any discretion 8affecting the decision to grant a permit or exemption. 9    (e) The State Board may, by rule, delegate authority to 10the Chairman to grant permits or exemptions when applications 11meet all of the State Board's review criteria and are 12unopposed.13    (f) A permit or exemption shall be obtained prior to the 14acquisition of major medical equipment or to the construction, 15establishment, or modification of a health care facility 16which:17        (1) (a) requires a total capital expenditure in excess 18    of the capital expenditure minimum; or19        (2) (b) substantially changes the scope or changes the 20    functional operation of the facility; or21        (3) (c) changes the bed capacity of a health care 22    facility by increasing the total number of beds or by 23    distributing beds among various categories of service or 24    by relocating beds from one physical facility or site to 25    another by more than 20 beds or more than 10% of total bed 26    capacity as defined by the State Board, whichever is less,   SB3239- 26 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    over a 2-year period.2    (g) A permit shall be valid only for the defined 3construction or modification modifications, site determined by 4legal street address or corresponding legal description, 5project amount, and person or persons named in the application 6for such permit. The State Board may approve the transfer of an 7existing permit without regard to whether the permit to be 8transferred has yet been financially committed, except for 9permits to establish a new facility or category of service. A 10permit shall be valid until such time as the project has been 11completed, provided that the project commences and proceeds to 12completion with due diligence by the completion date or 13extension date approved by the Board. 14    (h) A permit holder must do the following: (i) submit the 15final completion and cost report for the project within 90 16days after the approved project completion date or extension 17date and (ii) submit annual progress reports no earlier than 1830 days before and no later than 30 days after each anniversary 19date of the Board's approval of the permit until the project is 20completed. To maintain a valid permit and to monitor progress 21toward project commencement and completion, routine 22post-permit reports shall be limited to annual progress 23reports and the final completion and cost report. Annual 24progress reports shall include information regarding the 25committed funds expended toward the approved project. For 26projects to be completed in 12 months or less, the permit   SB3239- 27 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1holder shall report financial commitment in the final 2completion and cost report. For projects to be completed 3between 12 to 24 months, the permit holder shall report 4financial commitment in the first annual report. For projects 5to be completed in more than 24 months, the permit holder shall 6report financial commitment in the second annual progress 7report. The report shall contain information regarding 8expenditures and financial commitments. The State Board may 9extend the financial commitment period after considering a 10permit holder's showing of good cause and request for 11additional time to complete the project. The State Board may 12approve the transfer of an existing permit without regard to 13whether the permit to be transferred has been financially 14committed, except for permits to establish a new facility or 15category of service. 16    The permit Certificate of Need process required under this 17Act is designed to restrain rising health care costs by 18preventing unnecessary construction or modification of health 19care facilities. The Board must assure that the establishment, 20construction, or modification of a health care facility or the 21acquisition of major medical equipment is consistent with the 22public interest and that the proposed project is consistent 23with the orderly and economic development or acquisition of 24those facilities and equipment and is in accord with the 25standards, criteria, or plans of need adopted and approved by 26the Board. Board decisions regarding the construction of   SB3239- 28 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1health care facilities must consider capacity, quality, value, 2and equity. Projects may deviate from the costs, fees, and 3expenses provided in their project cost information for the 4project's cost components, provided that the final total 5project cost does not exceed the approved permit amount. 6Project alterations shall not increase the total approved 7permit amount by more than the limit set forth under the 8Board's rules. 9    The acquisition by any person of major medical equipment 10that will not be owned by or located in a health care facility 11and that will not be used to provide services to inpatients of 12a health care facility shall be exempt from review provided 13that a notice is filed in accordance with exemption 14requirements.15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, no permit 16or exemption is required for the construction or modification 17of a non-clinical service area of a health care facility.18(Source: P.A. 100-518, eff. 6-1-18; 100-681, eff. 8-3-18.) 19    (20 ILCS 3960/6)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1156)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)21    Sec. 6. Application for permit or exemption; exemption 22regulations. 23    (a) An application for a permit or exemption shall be made 24to the State Board upon forms provided by the State Board. This 25application shall contain such information as the State Board   SB3239- 29 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1deems necessary. The State Board shall not require an 2applicant to file a Letter of Intent before an application is 3filed. Such application shall include affirmative evidence on 4which the State Board or Chairman may make its decision on the 5approval or denial of the permit or exemption, including, but 6not limited to, affirmative evidence:7        (1) that the applicant is fit, willing, and able to 8    provide a proper standard of health care service for the 9    community with regard to the qualification, background and 10    character of the applicant;11        (2) that economic feasibility is demonstrated in terms 12    of effect on the existing and projected operating budget 13    of the applicant and of the health care facility, 14    including:15            (A) the applicant's ability to establish and 16        operate the facility in accordance with licensure 17        regulations set forth in State law; and18            (B) the projected impact on the total health care 19        expenditures in the facility and community;20        (3) that safeguards are provided that assure that the 21    establishment, construction, or modification of the health 22    care facility or acquisition of major medical equipment is 23    consistent with the public interest; and24        (4) that the proposed project is consistent with the 25    orderly and economic development of the facilities and 26    equipment and is in accord with standards, criteria, or   SB3239- 30 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    plans of need adopted and approved under Section 12.2    (b) The State Board shall establish by regulation the 3procedures and criteria governing the submission, review, and 4requirements regarding issuance of exemptions. The State Board 5may determine whether an application meets the criteria for an 6exemption and may approve, deny, or defer for additional 7information an application for an exemption. The submission of 8an application and information required by the State Board, as 9established by rule, shall not obligate the State Board to 10grant an exemption. If an exemption is denied, the applicant 11shall file an application for a permit. An exemption shall be 12approved when information required by the Board by rule is 13submitted. Projects eligible for an exemption, rather than a 14permit, include a , but are not limited to, change of ownership 15of a health care facility and discontinuation of one a 16category of service, other than a health care facility 17maintained by the State or any agency or department thereof or 18a nursing home maintained by a county. The Board may accept an 19application for an exemption for the discontinuation of a 20category of service at a health care facility only once in a 2112-month 6-month period following (1) the previous application 22for exemption at the same health care facility or (2) the final 23decision of the Board regarding the discontinuation of a 24category of service at the same health care facility, 25whichever occurs later. A discontinuation of a category of 26service shall otherwise require an application for a permit if   SB3239- 31 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1an application for an exemption has already been approved 2accepted within the 12-month 6-month period. For a change of 3ownership among related persons of a health care facility, the 4State Board shall provide by rule for an expedited process for 5obtaining an exemption. For the purposes of this Section, 6"change of ownership among related persons" means a 7transaction in which the parties to the transaction are under 8common control or ownership before and after the transaction 9is complete. 10    (c) All applications shall be signed by the applicant and 11shall be verified by any 2 officers or authorized 12representatives thereof.13    (c-5) Any written review or findings of the Board staff 14set forth in the State Board Staff Report concerning an 15application for a permit must be made available to the public 16and the applicant at least 14 calendar days before the meeting 17of the State Board at which the review or findings are 18considered. The applicant and members of the public may 19submit, to the State Board, written responses regarding the 20facts set forth in the review or findings of the Board staff. 21Members of the public and the applicant shall have until 10 22days before the meeting of the State Board to submit any 23written response concerning the Board staff's written review 24or findings. The Board staff may revise any findings to 25address corrections of factual errors cited in the public 26response. At the meeting, the State Board may, in its   SB3239- 32 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1discretion, permit the submission of other additional written 2materials. 3    (d) Upon receipt of an application for a permit, the State 4Board may determine whether an application meets the criteria 5for a permit and may shall approve, deny, or defer for 6additional information an application for a permit. and 7authorize the issuance of a permit if it finds (1) that the 8applicant is fit, willing, and able to provide a proper 9standard of health care service for the community with 10particular regard to the qualification, background and 11character of the applicant, (2) that economic feasibility is 12demonstrated in terms of effect on the existing and projected 13operating budget of the applicant and of the health care 14facility; in terms of the applicant's ability to establish and 15operate such facility in accordance with licensure regulations 16promulgated under pertinent state laws; and in terms of the 17projected impact on the total health care expenditures in the 18facility and community, (3) that safeguards are provided that 19assure that the establishment, construction or modification of 20the health care facility or acquisition of major medical 21equipment is consistent with the public interest, and (4) that 22the proposed project is consistent with the orderly and 23economic development of such facilities and equipment and is 24in accord with standards, criteria, or plans of need adopted 25and approved pursuant to the provisions of Section 12 of this 26Act.  SB3239- 33 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1(Source: P.A. 100-518, eff. 6-1-18; 100-681, eff. 8-3-18; 2101-83, eff. 7-15-19.) 3    (20 ILCS 3960/6.2)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)5    Sec. 6.2. Review of permits and exemptions; public 6hearings; State Board Staff Reports. 7    (a) Upon receipt of an application for an exemption or a 8permit to establish, construct, or modify a health care 9facility, the State Board staff shall notify the applicant in 10writing within 10 business working days either that the 11application is or is not substantially complete. If the 12application is substantially complete, the State Board staff 13shall notify the applicant of the beginning of the review 14process. If the application is not substantially complete, the 15Board staff shall explain within the 10-day period why the 16application is incomplete.17    (b) The State Board staff shall afford a reasonable amount 18of time as established by the State Board, but not to exceed 19120 days, for the review of the application. The 120-day 20period begins on the day the application is found to be 21substantially complete, as that term is defined by the State 22Board. During the 120-day period, the applicant may request an 23extension. An applicant may modify the application, as 24established by the State Board by rule, at any time before a 25final administrative decision has been made on the   SB3239- 34 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1application. 2    The State Board staff shall submit its State Board Staff 3Report to the State Board for its decision-making regarding 4approval or denial of the permit.5    (c) When an application for an exemption or a permit is 6initially reviewed by State Board staff, as provided in this 7Section, the State Board shall, upon request by the applicant 8or an interested person, afford an opportunity for a public 9hearing within a reasonable amount of time after receipt of 10the complete application, but not to exceed 90 days after 11receipt of the complete application. Notice of the hearing 12shall be made promptly, not less than 10 business days before 13the hearing, by certified mail to the applicant and, not less 14than 10 business days before the hearing, by publication on 15the State Board's website, in the principal office and 16website, if available, of the local government a newspaper of 17general circulation in the area or community to be affected, 18and in the location where the meeting is to be held. The 19hearing shall be held in the area or community in which the 20proposed project is to be located and shall be for the purpose 21of allowing the applicant and any interested person to present 22public testimony concerning the approval, denial, renewal, or 23revocation of the permit or exemption. All interested persons 24attending the hearing shall be given a reasonable opportunity 25to present their views or arguments in writing or orally, and a 26record of all of the testimony shall accompany any findings of   SB3239- 35 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1the State Board staff. The State Board shall adopt reasonable 2rules and regulations governing the procedure and conduct of 3the hearings. 4    (d) The staff of the State Board shall submit its State 5Board Staff Report to the State Board for approval or denial of 6the permit or exemption. 7(Source: P.A. 99-114, eff. 7-23-15; 100-681, eff. 8-3-18.) 8    (20 ILCS 3960/8.5)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)10    Sec. 8.5. Certificate of exemption for change of ownership 11of a health care facility; discontinuation of a category of 12service; public notice and public hearing.13    (a) The State Board may grant, deny, or defer for 14additional information an application for a certificate of 15exemption for a change of ownership or the discontinuation of 16one category of service. The State Board's determination shall 17be based on a review and consideration of the applicable 18criteria, application and supporting documentation, State 19Board Staff Report, public comment, public hearing testimony, 20and any other information that State Board deems relevant. If 21an application for a certificate of exemption is denied, the 22applicant shall file an application for a permit. 23    (a-2) (a) Upon a finding that an application for a change 24of ownership is complete, the State Board shall publish a 25legal notice on 3 consecutive days on the State Board's   SB3239- 36 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1website and in the principal office and website, if available, 2of the local government in the area or community to be affected 3in a newspaper of general circulation in the area or community 4to be affected and afford the public an opportunity to request 5a hearing. If the application is for a facility located in a 6Metropolitan Statistical Area, an additional legal notice 7shall be published in a newspaper of limited circulation, if 8one exists, in the area in which the facility is located. If 9the newspaper of limited circulation is published on a daily 10basis, the additional legal notice shall be published on 3 11consecutive days. The applicant shall pay the cost incurred by 12the Board in publishing the change of ownership notice in 13newspapers as required under this subsection. The legal notice 14shall also be posted on the Health Facilities and Services 15Review Board's web site and sent to the State Representative 16and State Senator of the district in which the health care 17facility is located and to the Office of the Attorney General. 18An application for change of ownership of a hospital shall not 19be deemed complete without a signed certification that for a 20period of 2 years after the change of ownership transaction is 21effective, the hospital will not adopt a charity care policy 22that is more restrictive than the policy in effect during the 23year prior to the transaction. An application for a change of 24ownership shall contain the proposed need not contain signed 25transaction documents or, if not available at the time of 26filing, at a minimum, include so long as it includes the   SB3239- 37 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1following key terms of the transaction: names and background 2of the parties; structure of the transaction; the person who 3will be the licensed or certified entity or operator after the 4transaction; the ownership or membership interests in such 5licensed or certified entity both prior to and after the 6transaction; fair market value of assets to be transferred; 7and the purchase price or other form of consideration to be 8provided for those assets. Upon the The issuance of the 9certificate of exemption shall be contingent upon the 10applicant shall submit submitting a statement to the Board 11within 90 days after the closing date of the transaction, or 12such longer period as provided by the Board, certifying that 13the change of ownership has been completed in accordance with 14the key terms contained in the application. If such key terms 15of the transaction change, a new application shall be 16required. 17    Where a change of ownership is among related persons, and 18there are no other changes being proposed at the health care 19facility that would otherwise require a permit or exemption 20under this Act, the applicant shall submit an application 21consisting of a standard notice in a form set forth by the 22Board briefly explaining the reasons for the proposed change 23of ownership. Once such an application is submitted to the 24Board and reviewed by the Board staff, the State Board Chair 25shall take action on an application for an exemption for a 26change of ownership among related persons at the next meeting   SB3239- 38 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1within 45 days after the application has been deemed complete, 2provided the application meets the applicable standards under 3this Section. If the Board Chair has a conflict of interest or 4for other good cause, the Chair may request review by the 5Board. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, for 6purposes of this Section, a change of ownership among related 7persons means a transaction where the parties to the 8transaction are under common control or ownership before and 9after the transaction is completed.10    Nothing in this Act shall be construed as authorizing the 11Board to impose any conditions, obligations, or limitations, 12other than those required by this Section, with respect to the 13issuance of an exemption for a change of ownership, including, 14but not limited to, the time period before which a subsequent 15change of ownership of the health care facility could be 16sought, or the commitment to continue to offer for a specified 17time period any services currently offered by the health care 18facility.19    The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 103rd 20General Assembly are inoperative on and after January 1, 2027. 21     (a-3) (Blank). 22     (a-5) Upon a finding that an application to discontinue a 23category of service is complete and provides the requested 24information, as specified by the State Board, an exemption 25shall be issued. No later than 30 days after the approval 26issuance of the exemption by the State Board, the health care   SB3239- 39 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1facility must give written notice of the discontinuation of 2the category of service to the State Senator and State 3Representative serving the legislative district in which the 4health care facility is located. No later than 90 days after a 5discontinuation of a category of service, the applicant must 6submit a statement to the State Board certifying that the 7discontinuation is complete. 8    (b) If a public hearing is requested, it shall be held at 9least 15 days but no more than 30 days after the date of 10publication of the legal notice in the community in which the 11facility is located. The hearing shall be held in the affected 12area or community in a place of reasonable size and 13accessibility and a full and complete written transcript of 14the proceedings shall be made. All interested persons 15attending the hearing shall be given a reasonable opportunity 16to present their positions in writing or orally. The applicant 17shall provide a summary or describe the proposed change of 18ownership at the public hearing.19    (c) (Blank). For the purposes of this Section "newspaper 20of limited circulation" means a newspaper intended to serve a 21particular or defined population of a specific geographic area 22within a Metropolitan Statistical Area such as a municipality, 23town, village, township, or community area, but does not 24include publications of professional and trade associations.25    (d) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 26Act of the 101st General Assembly shall apply to all   SB3239- 40 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1applications submitted after the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. 3(Source: P.A. 103-526, eff. 1-1-24.) 4    (20 ILCS 3960/8.7)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)6    Sec. 8.7. Application for permit for discontinuation of a 7health care facility or category of service; public notice and 8public hearing.9    (a) The State Board may grant, deny, or defer for 10additional information an application for a permit for a 11discontinuation of a health care facility or more than one 12category of service simultaneously. The State Board's 13determination shall be based on a review and consideration of 14the applicable criteria, application and supporting 15documentation, State Board Staff Report, public comment, 16public hearing testimony, and any other information that the 17State Board deems relevant. 18    (a-5) (a) Upon a finding that an application to 19discontinue close a health care facility or discontinue more 20than one categories a category of service is complete, the 21State Board shall publish a legal notice on the State Board's 22website and in the principal office and website, if available, 23of the local government in the area or community to be affected 243 consecutive days in a newspaper of general circulation in 25the area or community to be affected and afford the public an   SB3239- 41 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1opportunity to request a hearing. If the application is for a 2facility located in a Metropolitan Statistical Area, an 3additional legal notice shall be published in a newspaper of 4limited circulation, if one exists, in the area in which the 5facility is located. If the newspaper of limited circulation 6is published on a daily basis, the additional legal notice 7shall be published on 3 consecutive days. The legal notice 8shall also be posted on the Health Facilities and Services 9Review Board's website and sent to the State Representative 10and State Senator of the district in which the health care 11facility is located. In addition, the health care facility 12shall provide notice of closure to the local media that the 13health care facility would routinely notify about facility 14events.15    An application to close a health care facility shall only 16be deemed complete if it includes evidence that the health 17care facility provided written notice at least 30 days prior 18to filing the application of its intent to do so to the 19municipality in which it is located, the State Representative 20and State Senator of the district in which the health care 21facility is located, the State Board, the Director of Public 22Health, and the Director of Healthcare and Family Services. 23The changes made to this subsection by this amendatory Act of 24the 101st General Assembly shall apply to all applications 25submitted after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 26the 101st General Assembly.   SB3239- 42 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    (b) No later than 30 days after issuance of a permit to 2discontinue close a health care facility or discontinue more 3than one category a category of service, the permit holder 4shall give written notice of the closure or discontinuation to 5the State Senator and State Representative serving the 6legislative district in which the health care facility is 7located. 8    (c)(1) If there is a pending lawsuit that challenges an 9application to discontinue a health care facility that either 10names the Board as a party or alleges fraud in the filing of 11the application, the Board may defer action on the application 12until all litigation related to the application is complete 13for up to 6 months after the date of the initial deferral of 14the application.15    (2) The Board may defer action on an application to 16discontinue a hospital that is pending before the Board as of 17the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 18Assembly for up to 60 days after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly.20    (3) The Board may defer taking final action on an 21application to discontinue a hospital that is filed on or 22after January 12, 2021, until the earlier to occur of: (i) the 23expiration of the statewide disaster declaration proclaimed by 24the Governor of the State of Illinois due to the COVID-19 25pandemic that is in effect on January 12, 2021, or any 26extension thereof, or July 1, 2021, whichever occurs later; or   SB3239- 43 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1(ii) the expiration of the declaration of a public health 2emergency due to the COVID-19 pandemic as declared by the 3Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services 4that is in effect on January 12, 2021, or any extension 5thereof, or July 1, 2021, whichever occurs later. This 6paragraph (3) is repealed as of the date of the expiration of 7the statewide disaster declaration proclaimed by the Governor 8of the State of Illinois due to the COVID-19 pandemic that is 9in effect on January 12, 2021, or any extension thereof, or 10July 1, 2021, whichever occurs later. 11    (d) (Blank). The changes made to this Section by this 12amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly shall apply to 13all applications submitted after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly.15    (e) An application for a permit under this Section is 16required for the discontinuation of a hospital regardless of 17whether the facility is licensed independently or licensed 18under a dual campus license.19(Source: P.A. 101-83, eff. 7-15-19; 101-650, eff. 7-7-20; 20102-4, eff. 4-27-21.) 21    (20 ILCS 3960/10)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1160)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)23    Sec. 10. Administrative hearings following an initial 24denial or revocation of a permit. Presenting information 25relevant to the approval of a permit or certificate or in   SB3239- 44 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1opposition to the denial of the application; notice of outcome 2and review proceedings. When a motion by the State Board, to 3approve an application for a permit, fails to pass, the 4applicant or the holder of the permit, as the case may be, and 5such other parties as the State Board permits, will be given an 6opportunity to appear before the State Board and present such 7information as may be relevant to the approval of a permit.8    Subsequent to an appearance by the applicant before the 9State Board or default of such opportunity to appear, a motion 10by the State Board to approve an application for a permit which 11fails to pass shall be considered an initial denial of the 12application for a permit, as the case may be. Such action of an 13initial denial or an action by the State Board to revoke a 14permit shall be communicated to the applicant or holder of the 15permit. Such person or organization shall be afforded an 16opportunity for a hearing before an administrative law judge, 17who is appointed by the Chairman of the State Board. A written 18notice of a request for such hearing shall be served upon the 19Chairman of the State Board or the Agency within 30 days 20following notification of the decision of the State Board. The 21administrative law judge shall take actions necessary to 22ensure that the hearing is completed within a reasonable 23period of time, but not to exceed 120 days, except for delays 24or continuances agreed to by the person requesting the 25hearing. Following its consideration of the report of the 26hearing, or upon default of the party to the hearing, the State   SB3239- 45 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1Board shall make its final determination, specifying its 2findings and conclusions within 90 days of receiving the 3written report of the hearing. A copy of such determination 4shall be sent by certified mail or served personally upon the 5party.6    A full and complete record shall be kept of all 7administrative hearing proceedings, including the notice of 8hearing, complaint, and all other documents in the nature of 9pleadings, written motions filed in the proceedings, and the 10report and orders of the State Board or hearing officer. All 11testimony shall be reported by either a court reporter or some 12other reliable means of recording but need not be transcribed 13unless the decision is appealed in accordance with the 14Administrative Review Law, as now or hereafter amended. A copy 15or copies of the administrative hearing transcript may be 16obtained by any interested party granted the right to 17intervene on payment of the cost of preparing such copy or 18copies.19    The State Board or administrative law judge hearing 20officer shall upon its own or the administrative law judge's 21his motion, or on the written request of any party to the 22administrative hearing proceeding who has, in the State 23Board's or administrative law judge's hearing officer's 24opinion, demonstrated the relevancy of such request to the 25outcome of the proceedings, issue subpoenas requiring the 26attendance and the giving of testimony by witnesses, and   SB3239- 46 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1subpoenas duces tecum requiring the production of books, 2papers, records, or memoranda. The fees of witnesses for 3attendance and travel shall be the same as the fees of 4witnesses before the circuit court of this State.5    When the witness is subpoenaed at the instance of the 6State Board, or its administrative law judge hearing officer, 7such fees shall be paid in the same manner as other expenses of 8the State Board, and when the witness is subpoenaed at the 9instance of any other party to any such proceeding the State 10Board may, in accordance with its rules, require that the cost 11of service of the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum and the fee 12of the witness be borne by the party at whose instance the 13witness is summoned. In such case, the State Board in its 14discretion, may require a deposit to cover the cost of such 15service and witness fees. A subpoena or subpoena duces tecum 16so issued shall be served in the same manner as a subpoena 17issued out of a court.18    Any circuit court of this State upon the application of 19the State Board or upon the application of any other party to 20the administrative hearing proceeding, may, in its discretion, 21compel the attendance of witnesses, the production of books, 22papers, records, or memoranda and the giving of testimony 23before it or its administrative law judge hearing officer 24conducting an investigation or holding a hearing authorized by 25this Act, by an attachment for contempt, or otherwise, in the 26same manner as production of evidence may be compelled before   SB3239- 47 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1the court.2(Source: P.A. 99-527, eff. 1-1-17; 100-681, eff. 8-3-18.) 3    (20 ILCS 3960/11)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1161)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)5    Sec. 11. Any person who is adversely affected by a final 6decision of the State Board may have such decision judicially 7reviewed. The provisions of the Administrative Review Law, as 8now or hereafter amended, and the rules adopted pursuant 9thereto shall apply to and govern all proceedings for the 10judicial review of final administrative decisions of the State 11Board. The term "administrative decisions" is as defined in 12Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure. In order to 13comply with subsection (b) of Section 3-108 of the 14Administrative Review Law of the Code of Civil Procedure, upon 15the filing of an administrative judicial review action, the 16State Board shall transcribe each State Board meeting using a 17certified court reporter. The transcript shall contain the 18record of the findings and decisions of the State Board. 19(Source: P.A. 98-1086, eff. 8-26-14.) 20    (20 ILCS 3960/12)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1162)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)22    Sec. 12. Powers and duties of State Board. For purposes of 23this Act, the State Board shall exercise the following powers 24and duties:  SB3239- 48 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1        (1) Prescribe rules, regulations, standards, criteria, 2    procedures or reviews which may vary according to the 3    purpose for which a particular review is being conducted 4    or the type of project reviewed and which are required to 5    carry out the provisions and purposes of this Act. 6    Policies and procedures of the State Board shall take into 7    consideration the priorities and needs of medically 8    underserved areas and other health care services, giving 9    special consideration to the impact of projects on access 10    to safety net services. 11        (2) Adopt procedures for public notice and hearing on 12    all proposed rules, regulations, standards, criteria, and 13    plans required to carry out the provisions of this Act.14        (3) (Blank).15        (4) Develop criteria and standards for health care 16    facilities planning, conduct statewide inventories of 17    health care facilities, maintain an updated inventory on 18    the Board's web site reflecting the most recent bed and 19    service changes and updated need determinations when new 20    census data become available or new need formulae are 21    adopted, and develop health care facility plans which 22    shall be utilized in the review of applications for permit 23    under this Act. Such health facility plans shall be 24    coordinated by the Board with pertinent State Plans. 25    Inventories pursuant to this Section of skilled or 26    intermediate care facilities licensed under the Nursing   SB3239- 49 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    Home Care Act, skilled or intermediate care facilities 2    licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act, skilled or 3    intermediate care facilities licensed under the MC/DD Act, 4    facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental Health 5    Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or nursing homes licensed 6    under the Hospital Licensing Act shall be conducted on an 7    annual basis no later than July 1 of each year and shall 8    include among the information requested a list of all 9    services provided by a facility to its residents and to 10    the community at large and differentiate between active 11    and inactive beds. 12        In developing health care facility plans, the State 13    Board shall consider, but shall not be limited to, the 14    following:15            (a) The size, composition and growth of the 16        population of the area to be served;17            (b) The number of existing and planned facilities 18        offering similar programs;19            (c) The extent of utilization of existing 20        facilities;21            (d) The availability of facilities which may serve 22        as alternatives or substitutes;23            (e) The availability of personnel necessary to the 24        operation of the facility;25            (f) Multi-institutional planning and the 26        establishment of multi-institutional systems where   SB3239- 50 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1        feasible;2            (g) The financial and economic feasibility of 3        proposed construction or modification; and4            (h) In the case of health care facilities 5        established by a religious body or denomination, the 6        needs of the members of such religious body or 7        denomination may be considered to be public need.8        The health care facility plans which are developed and 9    adopted in accordance with this Section shall form the 10    basis for the plan of the State to deal most effectively 11    with statewide health needs in regard to health care 12    facilities.13        (5) Coordinate with other state agencies having 14    responsibilities affecting health care facilities, 15    including those of licensure and cost reporting.16        (6) Solicit, accept, hold and administer on behalf of 17    the State any grants or bequests of money, securities or 18    property for use by the State Board in the administration 19    of this Act; and enter into contracts consistent with the 20    appropriations for purposes enumerated in this Act.21        (7) (Blank).22        (8) Prescribe rules, regulations, standards, and 23    criteria for the conduct of an expeditious review of 24    applications for permits for projects of construction or 25    modification of a health care facility, which projects are 26    classified as emergency, substantive, or non-substantive   SB3239- 51 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    in nature. 2        Substantive projects shall include no more than the 3    following:4            (a) Projects to construct (1) a new or replacement 5        facility located on a new site or (2) a replacement 6        facility located on the same site as the original 7        facility and the cost of the replacement facility 8        exceeds the capital expenditure minimum, which shall 9        be reviewed by the Board within 120 days;10            (b) Projects proposing a (1) new service within an 11        existing healthcare facility or (2) discontinuation of 12        a service within an existing healthcare facility, 13        which shall be reviewed by the Board within 60 days; or14            (c) Projects proposing a change in the bed 15        capacity of a health care facility by an increase in 16        the total number of beds or by a redistribution of beds 17        among various categories of service or by a relocation 18        of beds from one physical facility or site to another 19        by more than 20 beds or more than 10% of total bed 20        capacity, as defined by the State Board, whichever is 21        less, over a 2-year period.22        The Chairman may approve applications for exemption 23    that meet the criteria set forth in rules or refer them to 24    the full Board. The Chairman may approve any unopposed 25    application for permit that meets all of the review 26    criteria or refer them to the full Board.   SB3239- 52 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1        Such rules shall not prevent the conduct of a public 2    hearing upon the timely request of an interested party. 3    Such reviews shall not exceed 60 days from the date the 4    application is declared to be complete.5        (9) Prescribe rules, regulations, standards, and 6    criteria pertaining to the granting of permits for 7    construction and modifications which are emergent in 8    nature and must be undertaken immediately to prevent or 9    correct structural deficiencies or hazardous conditions 10    that may harm or injure persons using the facility, as 11    defined in the rules and regulations of the State Board. 12    This procedure is exempt from public hearing requirements 13    of this Act.14        (10) Prescribe rules, regulations, standards and 15    criteria for the conduct of an expeditious review, not 16    exceeding 60 days, of applications for permits for 17    projects to construct or modify health care facilities 18    which are needed for the care and treatment of persons who 19    have acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) or related 20    conditions.21        (10.5) Provide its basis or rationale when voting on 22    an item before it at a State Board meeting in order to 23    comply with subsection (b) of Section 3-108 of the Code of 24    Civil Procedure.25        (11) Issue written decisions upon request of the 26    applicant or an adversely affected party to the Board.   SB3239- 53 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    Requests for a written decision shall be made within 15 2    days after the Board meeting in which a final decision has 3    been made. A "final decision" for purposes of this Act is 4    the decision to approve or deny an application, or take 5    other actions permitted under this Act, at the time and 6    date of the meeting that such action is scheduled by the 7    Board. The transcript of the State Board meeting shall be 8    incorporated into the Board's final decision. The staff of 9    the Board shall prepare a written copy of the final 10    decision and the Board shall approve a final copy for 11    inclusion in the formal record. The Board shall consider, 12    for approval, the written draft of the final decision no 13    later than the next scheduled Board meeting. The written 14    decision shall identify the applicable criteria and 15    factors listed in this Act and the Board's regulations 16    that were taken into consideration by the Board when 17    coming to a final decision. If the Board denies or fails to 18    approve an application for permit or exemption, the Board 19    shall Prepare and include in the final decision of a 20    denial or non-approval of a permit a detailed explanation 21    as to why the application was denied and identify what 22    specific criteria or standards the applicant did not meet 23    fulfill.24        (12) (Blank).25        (13) Provide a mechanism for the public to comment on, 26    and request changes to, draft rules and standards.  SB3239- 54 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1        (14) Implement public information campaigns to 2    regularly inform the general public about the opportunity 3    for public hearings and public hearing procedures.4        (15) Establish a separate set of rules and guidelines 5    for long-term care that recognizes that nursing homes are 6    a different business line and service model from other 7    regulated facilities. An open and transparent process 8    shall be developed that considers the following: how 9    skilled nursing fits in the continuum of care with other 10    care providers, modernization of nursing homes, 11    establishment of more private rooms, development of 12    alternative services, and current trends in long-term care 13    services. The Chairman of the Board shall appoint a 14    permanent Health Services Review Board Long-term Care 15    Facility Advisory Subcommittee that shall develop and 16    recommend to the Board the rules to be established by the 17    Board under this paragraph (15). The Subcommittee shall 18    also provide continuous review and commentary on policies 19    and procedures relative to long-term care and the review 20    of related projects. The Subcommittee shall make 21    recommendations to the Board no later than January 1, 2016 22    and every January thereafter pursuant to the 23    Subcommittee's responsibility for the continuous review 24    and commentary on policies and procedures relative to 25    long-term care. In consultation with other experts from 26    the health field of long-term care, the Board and the   SB3239- 55 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    Subcommittee shall study new approaches to the current bed 2    need formula and Health Service Area boundaries to 3    encourage flexibility and innovation in design models 4    reflective of the changing long-term care marketplace and 5    consumer preferences and submit its recommendations to the 6    Chairman of the Board no later than January 1, 2017. The 7    Subcommittee shall evaluate, and make recommendations to 8    the State Board regarding, the buying, selling, and 9    exchange of beds between long-term care facilities within 10    a specified geographic area or drive time. The Board shall 11    file the proposed related administrative rules for the 12    separate rules and guidelines for long-term care required 13    by this paragraph (15) by no later than September 30, 14    2011. The Subcommittee shall be provided a reasonable and 15    timely opportunity to review and comment on any review, 16    revision, or updating of the criteria, standards, 17    procedures, and rules used to evaluate project 18    applications as provided under Section 12.3 of this Act. 19        The Chairman of the Board shall appoint voting members 20    of the Subcommittee, who shall serve for a period of 3 21    years, with one-third of the terms expiring each January, 22    to be determined by lot. Appointees shall include, but not 23    be limited to, recommendations from each of the 3 24    statewide long-term care associations, with an equal 25    number to be appointed from each. Compliance with this 26    provision shall be through the appointment and   SB3239- 56 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    reappointment process. All appointees serving as of April 2    1, 2015 shall serve to the end of their term as determined 3    by lot or until the appointee voluntarily resigns, 4    whichever is earlier. 5        One representative from the Department of Public 6    Health, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 7    the Department on Aging, and the Department of Human 8    Services may each serve as an ex-officio non-voting member 9    of the Subcommittee. The Chairman of the Board shall 10    select a Subcommittee Chair, who shall serve for a period 11    of 3 years. 12        (16) Prescribe the format of the State Board Staff 13    Report. A State Board Staff Report shall pertain to 14    applications that include, but are not limited to, 15    applications for permit or exemption, applications for 16    permit renewal, applications for extension of the 17    financial commitment period, applications requesting a 18    declaratory ruling, or applications under the Health Care 19    Worker Self-Referral Act. State Board Staff Reports shall 20    compare applications to the relevant review criteria under 21    the Board's rules. 22        (17) Establish a separate set of rules and guidelines 23    for facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental 24    Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013. An application for the 25    re-establishment of a facility in connection with the 26    relocation of the facility shall not be granted unless the   SB3239- 57 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    applicant has a contractual relationship with at least one 2    hospital to provide emergency and inpatient mental health 3    services required by facility consumers, and at least one 4    community mental health agency to provide oversight and 5    assistance to facility consumers while living in the 6    facility, and appropriate services, including case 7    management, to assist them to prepare for discharge and 8    reside stably in the community thereafter. No new 9    facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental Health 10    Rehabilitation Act of 2013 shall be established after June 11    16, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-651) except 12    in connection with the relocation of an existing facility 13    to a new location. An application for a new location shall 14    not be approved unless there are adequate community 15    services accessible to the consumers within a reasonable 16    distance, or by use of public transportation, so as to 17    facilitate the goal of achieving maximum individual 18    self-care and independence. At no time shall the total 19    number of authorized beds under this Act in facilities 20    licensed under the Specialized Mental Health 21    Rehabilitation Act of 2013 exceed the number of authorized 22    beds on June 16, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 23    98-651). 24        (18) Elect a Vice Chairman to preside over State Board 25    meetings and otherwise act in place of the Chairman when 26    the Chairman is unavailable.   SB3239- 58 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1(Source: P.A. 100-518, eff. 6-1-18; 100-681, eff. 8-3-18; 2101-83, eff. 7-15-19.) 3    (20 ILCS 3960/12.2)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)5    Sec. 12.2. Powers of the State Board staff. For purposes 6of this Act, the staff shall exercise the following powers and 7duties:8        (1) Review applications for permits and exemptions in 9    accordance with the standards, criteria, and plans of need 10    established by the State Board under this Act and certify 11    its finding to the State Board.12        (1.5) Post the following on the Board's web site: 13    relevant (i) rules, (ii) standards, (iii) criteria, (iv) 14    State norms, (v) references used by Board staff in making 15    determinations about whether application criteria are met, 16    and (vi) notices of project-related filings, including 17    notice of public comments related to the application.18        (2) Charge and collect an amount determined by the 19    State Board and the staff to be reasonable fees for the 20    processing of applications by the State Board. The State 21    Board shall set the amounts by rule. Application fees for 22    continuing care retirement communities, and other health 23    care models that include regulated and unregulated 24    components, shall apply only to those components subject 25    to regulation under this Act. All fees and fines collected   SB3239- 59 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    under the provisions of this Act shall be deposited into 2    the Illinois Health Facilities Planning Fund to be used 3    for the expenses of administering this Act.4        (2.1) Publish the following reports on the State Board 5    website:6            (A) An annual accounting, aggregated by category 7        and with names of parties redacted, of fees, fines, 8        and other revenue collected as well as expenses 9        incurred, in the administration of this Act.10            (B) An annual report, with names of the parties 11        redacted, that summarizes all settlement agreements 12        entered into with the State Board that resolve an 13        alleged instance of noncompliance with State Board 14        requirements under this Act.15            (C) (Blank).16            (D) Board reports showing the degree to which an 17        application conforms to the review standards, a 18        summation of relevant public testimony, and any 19        additional information that staff wants to 20        communicate. 21        (3) Coordinate with other State agencies having 22    responsibilities affecting health care facilities, 23    including licensure and cost reporting agencies.24        (4) Issue advisory opinions upon request. Staff 25    advisory opinions do not constitute determinations by the 26    State Board. Determinations by the State Board are made   SB3239- 60 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1    through the declaratory ruling process. 2    For purposes of this Section, "staff" means a person the 3State Board or the Agency employs on a full-time, part-time, 4contract, or intern basis. 5(Source: P.A. 100-681, eff. 8-3-18; 101-83, eff. 7-15-19.) 6    (20 ILCS 3960/13)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1163)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2029)8    Sec. 13. Review and investigation Investigation of 9applications for permits. The State Board and State Board 10employees shall make or cause to be made such a review of all 11submitted applications or investigations as it deems necessary 12in connection with an application for a permit or exemption, 13or in connection with a determination of whether or not a 14project or transaction construction or modification that has 15been commenced is in accord with the exemption or permit 16issued by the State Board, or whether a project or transaction 17construction or modification has been commenced without a 18permit or exemption having been obtained. The State Board may 19issue subpoenas duces tecum requiring the production of 20records and may administer oaths to such witnesses.21    Any circuit court of this State, upon the application of 22the State Board or upon the application of any proper party to 23such proceedings, may, in its discretion, compel the 24attendance of witnesses, the production of books, papers, 25records, or memoranda and the giving of testimony before the   SB3239- 61 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1State Board, by a proceeding as for contempt, or otherwise, in 2the same manner as production of evidence may be compelled 3before the court.4    The State Board shall require all health facilities 5operating in this State to provide such reasonable reports at 6such times and containing such information as is needed by it 7to carry out the purposes and provisions of this Act. Prior to 8collecting information from health facilities, the State Board 9shall make reasonable efforts through a public process to 10consult with health facilities and associations that represent 11them to determine whether data and information requests will 12result in useful information for health planning, whether 13sufficient information is available from other sources, and 14whether data requested is routinely collected by health 15facilities and is available without retrospective record 16review. Data and information requests shall not impose undue 17paperwork burdens on health care facilities and personnel. 18Health facilities not complying with this requirement shall be 19reported to licensing, accrediting, certifying, or payment 20agencies as being in violation of State law. Health care 21facilities and other parties at interest shall have reasonable 22access, under rules established by the State Board, to all 23planning information submitted in accord with this Act 24pertaining to their area.25    Among the reports to be required by the State Board are 26facility questionnaires for health care facilities licensed   SB3239- 62 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1under the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act, the 2Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the ID/DD 3Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized Mental 4Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013 and health care facilities 5that are required to meet the requirements of 42 CFR 494 in 6order to be certified for participation in Medicare and 7Medicaid under Titles XVIII and XIX of the federal Social 8Security Act. These questionnaires shall be conducted on an 9annual basis and compiled by the State Board. For health care 10facilities licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act or the 11Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, these 12reports shall include, but not be limited to, the 13identification of specialty services provided by the facility 14to patients, residents, and the community at large. Annual 15reports for facilities licensed under the ID/DD Community Care 16Act and facilities licensed under the MC/DD Act shall be 17different from the annual reports required of other health 18care facilities and shall be specific to those facilities 19licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or the MC/DD Act. 20The Health Facilities and Services Review Board shall consult 21with associations representing facilities licensed under the 22ID/DD Community Care Act and associations representing 23facilities licensed under the MC/DD Act when developing the 24information requested in these annual reports. For health care 25facilities that contain long term care beds, the reports shall 26also include the number of staffed long term care beds,   SB3239- 63 -LRB104 20078 SPS 33529 b1physical capacity for long term care beds at the facility, and 2long term care beds available for immediate occupancy. For 3purposes of this paragraph, "long term care beds" means beds 4(i) licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, (ii) licensed 5under the ID/DD Community Care Act, (iii) licensed under the 6MC/DD Act, (iv) licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act, or 7(v) licensed under the Specialized Mental Health 8Rehabilitation Act of 2013 and certified as skilled nursing or 9nursing facility beds under Medicaid or Medicare. 10(Source: P.A. 100-681, eff. 8-3-18; 100-957, eff. 8-19-18; 11101-81, eff. 7-12-19.)